Utah statutes.
78B-1-102.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Clerk" or "clerk of the court" means the person so designated by title
and includes any deputy clerk.
(2)  "Court" means trial court.
(3)  "Jury" means a body of persons temporarily selected from the citizens of
a particular county invested with the power to present and indict a person for
a public offense or to try a question of fact.
(4)  "Master jury list" means the source lists as prescribed by the Judicial
Council under Section 78B-1-106.
(5)  "Public necessity" means circumstances in which services performed by the
prospective juror to members of the public in either a public or a private
capacity cannot adequately be performed by others.
(6)  "Qualified jury list" means the list of prospective jurors whose names
are drawn at random from the master jury list and are determined to be
qualified to serve as jurors.
(7)  "Trial jury" means a body of persons selected from the citizens of a
particular county before a court or officer of competent jurisdiction and
sworn to try and determine by verdict a question of fact.
(8)  "Undue hardship" means circumstances in which the prospective juror
would:
(a)  be required to abandon a person under his or her personal care or incur
the cost of substitute care which is unreasonable under the circumstances;
(b)  suffer extreme physical hardship due to an illness, injury, or
disability; or
(c)  incur substantial costs or lost opportunities due to missing an event
that was scheduled prior to the initial notice of potential jury service.
